Utah statutes.
70D-3-204.   Renewal of license.

(1)  A license issued under this chapter expires on December 31 of each year.

(2)  To qualify to renew a license under this chapter an individual shall:

(a)  meet the requirements of Section 70D-3-202; and

(b)  complete the annual continuing education requirements of Section 70D-3-303.

(3)  To renew a license under this chapter an individual shall:

(a)  file an application with the commissioner in a form prescribed by the commissioner in rule;

(b)  demonstrate that the individual continues to meet the requirements related to the nationwide database under 12 U.S.C. Sec. 5104;

(c)  demonstrate completion of the continuing education requirements; and

(d)  notwithstanding the requirements applicable to a regulatory fee under Section 63J-1-504, pay a fee of $100.



Enacted by Chapter 72, 2009 General Session

